New York, session 2025-2026, S6769.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The multiple dwelling law is amended by adding a new 2 section 16 to read as follows: 3 § 16. Zoning lot mergers; non-compliance with applicable pre-existing 4 zoning regulations. 1. For the purposes of this section: 5 (a) "Tax lot" shall mean a parcel of land identified with a unique 6 borough, block and lot number for property tax. 7 (b) "Zoning lot development agreement" shall mean a contract to trans- 8 fer floor area from one parcel of land to another and permits a develop- 9 er to utilize the adjoining property's floor area to construct a build- 10 ing that is larger than would be permitted on the parcel being 11 developed. 12 2. The requirements of this section shall apply to multiple dwellings 13 in a city having a population of five million or more. 14 3. No lot resulting from a merger with any other lot for tax, adminis- 15 trative, zoning, or development purposes shall create any new non-com- 16 pliance with the applicable, pre-existing zoning regulations. 17 4. Transfer of floor area from one tax lot to another shall only take 18 place subject to the following conditions: 19 (a) The transfer shall not come from more than two adjacent tax lots 20 which result in more than a twenty percent increase in floor area for 21 the receiving lot prior to any lot merger and shall not result in a lot 22 with any new non-compliance with existing zoning regulations; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04097-01-5 S. 6769 2 1 (b) The lot or lots transferring floor area shall not have been 2 subject to a previous merger for tax, administrative, or development 3 reasons, nor shall such lot or lots have themselves previously have been 4 recipients of transferred floor area; and 5 (c) The receiving tax lot shall not also be the recipient of a floor 6 area bonus for the provision of affordable inclusionary housing or 7 providing mandatory inclusionary housing pursuant to the zoning resol- 8 ution for the city of New York. 9 5. The department shall maintain a publicly accessible database and 10 map of tax lots that indicate a floor area transfer has occurred or lots 11 have been merged and include an online version of the relevant zoning 12 lot development agreement. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 14 have become a law.